District of Columbia statutes.
1-328.16

Reporting requirements.

Beginning in 2014, a grantor managing a grant program covered by this part shall submit a report to the Mayor and the Council by November 1 of each year containing the following information:

(1)

All funds allocated pursuant to a grant program in the previous fiscal year;

(2)

The type of services and a timeline for delivery of services for the grant; and

(3)

Performance measures and performance outcomes for each grant issued during the previous fiscal year.

Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 1097, 60 DCR 12472
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 1097 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 1097 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
Section 1091 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle J of Title I of the act may be cited as the “Grant Administration Act of 2013”.
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.